Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 1 General Provisions [Repealed in certain counties]
16-16-112. Enforcement of small liens.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the county court to enforce vendors' liens and foreclose mortgages upon all sums under fifty dollars ($50.00), and also to enforce all liens on all sums under fifty dollars ($50.00) in such cases as the chancery court alone would have jurisdiction if the amount were more than fifty dollars ($50.00). The rules of practice and pleading in use in the chancery court on sums above fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be adopted or followed.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Acts 1887, ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1889, ch. 30, § 1; Shan., §§ 6035, 6036; mod. Code 1932, §§ 10232, 10233; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-714; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

16-16-113. Writs of possession.

The county court shall have the same power to issue writs of possession to put the purchaser in possession in all cases that the chancery court has and shall be governed by the same rules.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Acts 1887, ch. 141, § 3; Shan., § 6037; Code 1932, § 10234; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-715; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 21.

Collateral References. 72 C.J.S. Possessory Warrant § 6.

16-16-114. Bastardy.

The court has also original jurisdiction over bastardy and bastards, and general supervision of bastards.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4208 (deriv. Acts 1741, ch. 14, § 10); Shan., § 6040; Code 1932, § 10237; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-716; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cited: Ex parte Tweedy, 22 F. 84, 1884 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 159 (D. Tenn. 1884).

Collateral References. 10 C.J.S. Bastards § 56.

16-16-115. Powers to exercise concurrent jurisdiction.

The county court is, in cases of concurrent jurisdiction, vested with all the incidental powers belonging to or conferred by law upon the court with which its jurisdiction is concurrent, for the purpose of exercising and effectuating such jurisdiction.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4204; Shan., § 6031; Code 1932, § 10229; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-717; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 2, 21; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 7.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Cited: In re Estate of Ardell Hamilton Trigg, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 53 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 9, 2011).

16-16-116. Clerk.

The county clerk shall be the clerk of the court held by the county judge.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4199 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 253, § 7); Shan., § 6025; Code 1932, § 10223; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-718; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Duties of county clerk, title 18, ch. 6.

Cited: Johnson v. Brice, 112 Tenn. 59, 83 S.W. 791, 1903 Tenn. LEXIS 90 (1904).

16-16-117. Procedure in exercising concurrent jurisdiction.

The mode of procedure in the county court, where the jurisdiction is concurrent either with the circuit or chancery court, shall be as near as may be, according to the rules laid down for the conduct of similar business in those courts.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Code 1858, § 4196; Shan., § 6021; Code 1932, § 10220; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-719; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 2, 21.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

16-16-118. Return of process.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, all process shall be returnable to the first Monday coming five (5) days after the service of such process.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Acts 1911, ch. 3, § 2; Shan., § 6006a2; Code 1932, § 10206; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-720; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

16-16-119. Reference of questions of fact to clerk — Designation as probate master.

In the exercise of the jurisdiction conferred by § 16-16-107, by title 33, or by title 34, chapter 10, the county judge may, in the county judge's discretion, by general or special orders of reference, refer questions of fact to the county clerk, for taking of proof, either by depositions or by oral testimony, and making findings of fact with respect to the depositions or oral testimony. The county clerk or a deputy named by the county clerk may be designated as probate master and in that capacity shall have all the powers of a clerk and master in chancery.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than not more than

12,800 12,900

27,100 27,200

43,100 43,200

62,300 62,400

182,000 182,100

In counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, the circuit court clerk, who also serves as the general sessions court clerk, shall serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction in any such counties.

Acts 1955, ch. 146, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; modified; T.C.A., § 16-721; Acts 2003, ch. 310, §§ 1, 6-10; 2005, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective July 21, 2003, provided that subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 deleted Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8, effective April 5, 2005.

Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 9, effective July 21, 2003, provided, in part, that, in any county with a population of not less that twelve thousand eight hundred (12,800) nor more than twelve thousand nine hundred (12,900) according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with probate jurisdiction after the effective date of this act.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 1 provided that Acts 2003, ch. 310, § 8 is amended by deleting that section in its entirety.

Acts 2005, ch. 24, § 3 provided that, for the purpose of transferring records, files and other documents relating to probate matters in counties having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, from the office of the county court clerk to the office of the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect April 5, 2005. For all other purposes, including the transfer of duties and authority over probate matters to the circuit court clerk, the act shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 837.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461.

16-16-120. Information to be collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS index and the department of safety by those county and probate courts in which commitments to a mental institution are ordered.

As used in this section:

“Adjudication as a mental defective or adjudicated as a mental defective” means:

A determination by a court in this state that a person, as a result of marked subnormal intelligence, mental illness, incompetency, condition or disease:

Is a danger to such person or to others; or

Lacks the ability to contract or manage such person's own affairs due to mental defect;

A finding of insanity by a court in a criminal proceeding; or

A finding that a person is incompetent to stand trial or is found not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to §§ 50a and 72b of the Uniform Code of Military Justice, codified in 10 U.S.C. §§ 850a, 876b;

“Judicial commitment to a mental institution” means a judicially ordered involuntary admission to a private or state hospital or treatment resource in proceedings conducted pursuant to title 33, chapter 6 or 7;

“Mental institution” means a mental health facility, mental hospital, sanitarium, psychiatric facility and any other facility that provides diagnoses by a licensed professional of mental retardation or mental illness, including, but not limited to, a psychiatric ward in a general hospital;

“Treatment resource” means any public or private facility, service or program providing treatment or rehabilitation services for mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, including, but not limited to, detoxification centers, hospitals, community mental health centers, clinics or programs, halfway houses and rehabilitation centers.

Those county or probate courts wherein commitments to a mental institution are ordered pursuant to title 33, chapter 6 or 7 or persons are adjudicated as a mental defective shall enter a standing and continuing order instructing the clerk to collect and report as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of such an order or adjudication, information described in subsection (c) regarding individuals who have been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution for the purposes of complying with the NICS Improvement Amendments Act of 2007, P.L. 110-180.

The following information shall be collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS Index and the department of safety, pursuant to subsection (b):

Complete name and all aliases of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective, including, but not limited to, any names that the individual may have had or currently has by reason of marriage or otherwise;

Case or docket number of the judicial commitment or the adjudication as a mental defective;

Date judicial commitment ordered or adjudication as a mental defective was made;

Private or state hospital or treatment resource to which the individual was judicially committed; and

Date of birth of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective, if such information has been provided to the clerk.

The information in subdivisions (c)(1)-(5), the confidentiality of which is protected by other statutes or regulations, shall be maintained as confidential and not subject to public inspection pursuant to such statutes or regulations, except for such use as may be necessary in the conduct of any proceedings pursuant to §§ 39-17-1316, 39-17-1353 and 39-17-1354.

Acts 2009, ch. 578, § 4; 2013, ch. 300, § 6.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “collect and report as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of such an order or adjudication” for “collect and report January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of every year beginning January 1, 2010” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 578, § 13. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2013, ch. 300, § 11. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

16-16-121. Relief from firearm disabilities imposed on persons adjudicated as mental defective or judicially committed to mental institution.

A person who is subject to 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and (g)(4) because the person has been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution, as defined in § 16-16-120, may petition the county or probate court that entered the judicial commitment or adjudication order for relief from the firearm disabilities imposed by the adjudication or judicial commitment; provided, that the person may not petition the court until three (3) years from the date of release from commitment or the date of the adjudication order, whichever is later.

A copy of the petition for relief shall also be served on the district attorney general of the judicial district in which the original judicial commitment or adjudication occurred. The district attorney general may appear, support, object to, or present evidence relevant to the relief sought by the petitioner.

The court shall receive and consider evidence in an open proceeding, including evidence offered by the petitioner, concerning:

The circumstances that led to the imposition of the firearms disability under 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and (g)(4);

The petitioner's mental health records;

The petitioner's criminal history;

The petitioner's reputation; and

Changes in the petitioner's condition or circumstances relevant to the relief sought.

The court shall grant the petition for relief if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence and enters into the record the following:

The petitioner is no longer likely to act in a manner that is dangerous to public safety; and

Granting the relief would not be contrary to the public interest.

A record of the proceedings, to be provided by the petitioner, shall be made by a certified court reporter or by court-approved electronic means.

The petitioner may appeal a final order denying the requested relief, and the review on appeal, if granted, shall be de novo.

A person may file a petition for relief under this section no more than once every two (2) years.

Relief from a firearm disability granted under this section has no effect on the loss of civil rights, including firearm rights, for any reason other than the particular adjudication as a mental defective or judicial commitment to a mental institution from which relief is granted.

When the court issues an order granting a petition of relief under subsection (d), the court clerk shall, as soon as practicable but no later than thirty (30) days after issuance, forward a copy of the order to the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI). The TBI, upon receipt of the order, shall:

Immediately forward a copy of the order to the department of safety;

Update the National Instant Criminal Background Check System database and transmit the corrected records to the federal bureau of investigation; and

Remove and destroy all records relating to the petition for relief from any database over which the TBI exercises control.

The TBI and the department of safety shall not use or permit the use of the records or information obtained or retained pursuant to this section for any purpose not specified in this section.

Acts 2015, ch. 459, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 459, § 6. July 1, 2015.